Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2448.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 499C.2, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new paragraphs: NEW PARAGRAPH . f. A certification concerning the payment of dues, fees, or assessments that states whether the dues, fees, or assessments are paid in full or delinquent, and identifies any future dues, fees, or assessments which have been formally approved by a unit owners association for payment at a future date. NEW PARAGRAPH . g. A schedule and disclosure of all fees related to the transfer of real property ownership within the common interest community. Sec. 2. Section 499C.2, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 3. A unit owners association, a unit owners associationâs designee, or a unit owners associationâs management company may charge a reasonable fee for all records and documents provided under this section , including costs associated with developing and making available the certification required under subsection 1, paragraph âfâ . The fee shall not exceed the estimated cost of production or reproduction of the records or documents , or the reasonable cost associated with Senate File 2448, p. 2 developing and making available the certification required under subsection 1, paragraph âfâ . Upon request, the unit owner or the unit ownerâs authorized agent shall be provided reasonable documentation supporting the fee charged. Sec. 3. Section 558A.4A, subsection 5, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 5. Except as otherwise required by law, a home inspector shall not deliver a home inspection report to any person other than the client of the home inspector without the clientâs consent. The seller shall have the right, upon request, to receive without charge a copy of a home inspection report from the person for whom it was prepared from the buyer or the buyerâs authorized agent those portions of a home inspection report that relate to the remediation requests made by the buyer or the buyerâs authorized agent. If the buyer or the buyerâs authorized agent fails to provide the applicable portions of the inspection report to the seller, the seller may cancel the purchase contract for the inspected property without penalty . ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 2448, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor